Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.355

Moneys to be transmitted to general fund.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all fees and other moneys received by the secretary of state under this chapter must be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.

[ 2011 c 199 s 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 15; 1983 c 265 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.